Utah statutes.
76-1-502.   Negating defense by allegation or proof -- When not required.

Section 76-1-501 does not require negating a defense:

(1)  By allegation in an information, indictment, or other charge; or

(2)  By proof, unless:

(a)  The defense is in issue in the case as a result of evidence presented at trial, either by the prosecution or the defense; or

(b)  The defense is an affirmative defense, and the defendant has presented evidence of such affirmative defense.



Enacted by Chapter 196, 1973 General Session

